src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-19tujokas_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - tujokas: # Noun (19) tujokas 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     tujokas+A+Sg+Nom: tujokas
     tujokas+A+Sg+Gen: tujokadsõ
     tujokas+A+Sg+Par: tujokast
     tujokas+A+Sg+Ill: tujokastõ
     tujokas+A+Sg+Ine: tujokadsõn
     tujokas+A+Sg+Ela: tujokadsõst
     tujokas+A+Sg+All: tujokadsõlõ
     tujokas+A+Sg+Ade: tujokadsõl
     tujokas+A+Sg+Abl: tujokadsõlt
     tujokas+A+Sg+Tra: tujokadsõs
     tujokas+A+Sg+Ter: tujokadsõniq
     tujokas+A+Sg+Abe: tujokadsõldaq
     tujokas+A+Sg+Com: tujokadsõgaq
     tujokas+A+Pl+Nom: tujokadsõq
     tujokas+A+Pl+Gen: tujokaidsi
     tujokas+A+Pl+Par: tujokaidsi
     tujokas+A+Pl+Ill: tujokaidsihe
     tujokas+A+Pl+Ine: tujokaidsin
     tujokas+A+Pl+Ela: tujokaidsist
     tujokas+A+Pl+All: tujokaidsilõ
     tujokas+A+Pl+Ade: tujokaidsil
     tujokas+A+Pl+Abl: tujokaidsilt
     tujokas+A+Pl+Tra: tujokaidsis
     tujokas+A+Pl+Ter: tujokaidsiniq
     tujokas+A+Pl+Abe: tujokaidsildaq
     tujokas+A+Pl+Com: tujokaidsigaq

     tujokas+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: tujokadsõmb
